Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska43-4902
Public information program.

(1) Subject to available funding, it is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate sixty-five thousand dollars to the Department of Health and Human Services for fiscal year 2024-25 and ten thousand dollars each fiscal year thereafter, to develop, implement, and maintain a public information program to inform the general public of the Newborn Safe Haven Act.

(2) Components of the program shall include, but not be limited to:

(a) Creation and maintenance of a permanent, interactive website that provides information to the public about the Newborn Safe Haven Act, including authorized drop-off locations;

(b) Distribution of literature at statewide locations, as determined by the department, including the toll-free telephone number of the National Safe Haven Alliance;

(c) Development of educational, promotional, and informational materials in print, audio, video, electronic, and other media formats which includes the toll-free telephone number of the National Safe Haven Alliance; and

(d) Training to carry out the provisions of the Newborn Safe Haven Act for emergency care providers, 911 operators, hospital staff, firefighters, law enforcement officers, or any member of the public expressing an interest in such training.

Laws 2024, LB876, § 2.